Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.161

License—Reinstatement.

An escrow agent's license which has not been renewed may be reinstated at any time prior to the thirtieth day of January following its expiration, upon the payment to the director of the annual license fees then in default and a penalty equal to one-half of the annual license fees then in default.

[ 1999 c 30 s 14; 1965 c 153 s 12. Formerly RCW 18.44.120.]